Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2028
Exemption; limitation.

The exemption granted under section 13-2027 shall not constitute a waiver of or exemption from the bidding provisions of sections 16-321 and 17-568.01 or any other similar provision.

Laws 1984, LB 911, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1574;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 28.